North Dakota, session 69, HB1609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 27-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
State bar apprenticeship p rogram .
1. The supreme court, in cooperation with the state board of law examiners, shall
establish and implement an apprenticeship program to approve applicants to sit for the
bar examination as an alternative to receiving a juris doctor or equivalent degree from
a law school approved, or provisionally approved, for accreditation by the American
bar association.
2. The apprenticeship program must provide the following:
a. An applicant for admission to the state bar is qualified to be examined by the
state bar board if an applicant:
(1) Obtains a four-year college degree; and
(2) Has completed two thousand hours of engagement under the supervision of
a licensed attorney or a licensed tribal advocate, over a period not to
exceed five years.
b. A supervising attorney or supervising licensed tribal advocate must verify the
engagement of an applicant by submitting an affidavit to the state bar board.
Page No. 1 25.0917.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. The state bar board may not require a commencement notice, application, or
registration from an applicant before a supervised engagement.
d. An applicant has met the engagement requirement under paragraph 2 o f
subdivision a of subsection 2 by submitting an affidavit from a supervising
attorney or supervising tribal advocate verifying an applicant has completed two
thousand hours of engagement.
e. The supreme court, after receiving and considering the state board of law
examiners' report of the results of an examination of applicants for admission to
the bar of this state, including applicants from the apprenticeship program, and
the recommendations of the board, shall enter an order authorizing the issuance
of certificates of admission to the bar to those applicants the court considers
entitled to admission.
Page No. 2 25.0917.03000